Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 3. Medicaid.
§ 43-13-116.1.
Asset verification program; data match system with financial institutions; authority of division to request and financial institution to provide additional financial information as needed to verify eligibility.

For purposes of this section:

“Financial institution” has the meaning given by Sections 81-3-1 and 81-12-3, and shall include, but not be limited to, credit unions, stock brokerages, public or private entities administering retirement, savings, annuities, life insurance and/or pension funds.

“Account” means a demand deposit account, checking or negotiable withdrawal order account, savings account, time deposit account or money-market account.

In accordance with Section 1940 of the federal Social Security Act (42 USCS Section 1396w), the Division of Medicaid shall implement an asset verification program requiring each applicant for or recipient of Medicaid assistance on the basis of being aged, blind or disabled, to provide authorization by the applicant or recipient, their spouse, and by any other person whose resources are required by law to be disclosed to determine the eligibility of the applicant or recipient for Medicaid assistance, for the division to obtain from any financial institution financial records and information held by any such financial institution with respect to the applicant, recipient, spouse or such other person, as applicable, that the division determines are needed to verify the financial resources of the applicant, recipient or such other person in connection with a determination or redetermination with respect to eligibility for, or the amount or extent of, Medicaid assistance. Each aged, blind or disabled Medicaid applicant or recipient, their spouse, and any other applicable person described in this section shall provide authorization (as specified by 42 USCS Section 1396w(c)) to the division to obtain from any financial institution, any financial record, whenever the division determines that the record is needed in connection with a determination or redetermination of eligibility for Medicaid assistance.

In connection with the asset verification program, the division is authorized to enter into agreements with financial institutions doing business in the state:

To develop and operate a data match system, using automated data exchanges, in which the division will provide to the financial institution, on a quarterly or more frequent basis, the name, social security number or other taxpayer identification number, and any other necessary identifying information for each applicant for or recipient of Medicaid assistance and for each other person whose resources are required to be disclosed to determine the eligibility of the applicant or recipient for Medicaid assistance; and

Provide for payment to the financial institution of the reasonable costs of the institution for conducting the data matches and for responding to other requests made under this section, in accordance with the cost reimbursement requirements of Section 1115(a) of the Federal Right to Financial Privacy Act, 12 USCS Section 3415, as amended.

Any financial institution doing business in the State of Mississippi may enter into agreements with the division to engage in the data match system and also to disclose any accounts held by the institution on behalf of the persons so identified by the division and, if requested by the division, the account numbers, account balances, and all names and addresses and social security or other tax identification numbers on record for those accounts.

When the operation of the data match system results in the location of an account of an applicant for or recipient of Medicaid assistance or a person whose resources are required to be disclosed to determine the eligibility of the applicant or recipient for Medicaid assistance, the division may request and the financial institution may provide any additional financial records and information held by the financial institution as the division determines are needed to establish, continue, modify or terminate eligibility for Medicaid assistance.

A financial institution:

Shall have no liability for failing to disclose to any account holder or depositor that the name of the person has been received from the division or that the financial institution has furnished financial records or information pertaining to the account holder or depositor to the division under this section;

Shall have no liability for any delays, errors or omissions in conducting the data matches or in responding to other requests for records or information made under this section, which delays, errors or omissions result from circumstances beyond the control of the institution or from any unintentional, bona fide error, including, but not limited to, clerical or computer malfunction or programming error; and

Shall be absolutely immune from any civil or criminal liability to any person under any contract, common law, statute or regulation for the disclosure to the division, or to any authorized contractor or agents thereof, of any information, accounts, assets, financial records or information under this article, the agreements referred to in subsection (4) of this section, or in response to any notice or request issued by the division or by any authorized contractors or agents thereof, or for any action or omission taken or omitted in good faith to comply with the requirements of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 434, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.